Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
Oil and Gas Conservation
353.651.
Vertical and horizontal deep wells — Establishment and regulation of drilling units — Pooling of interests — Exceptions.

The following provisions of this section and the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant thereto shall apply to any vertical deep well and any horizontal deep well as indicated:

Drilling units for vertical deep wells:

The commission shall, after notice and a hearing, to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, regulate the drilling and location of vertical deep wells in a pool and the production therefrom so as to prevent reasonably avoidable net drainage from each developed unit (that is, drainage which is not equalized by counterdrainage) so that each owner in a pool shall have the right and opportunity to recover his or her fair and equitable share of the recoverable oil and gas in the pool;

For the prevention of waste, to protect and enforce the correlative rights of the owners in a pool, and to avoid the augmenting and accumulation of risks arising from the drilling of an excessive number of wells, the commission shall, after notice and a hearing, to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, establish drilling units for vertical deep wells in each pool. The spacing of vertical deep wells in proved oil and gas fields shall be governed by administrative regulations promulgated for that particular field or other administrative regulation promulgated by the commission. Vertical deep wells drilled in areas not covered by special field administrative regulations shall be governed by statewide administrative regulations promulgated by the commission or orders of the commission issued after a hearing;

Each vertical deep well permitted to be drilled in any drilling unit shall be drilled in accordance with:

The administrative regulations promulgated by the commission; and

A spacing pattern fixed by the commission for the well or the pool in which the vertical deep well is located, as applicable, with any exceptions that may be reasonably necessary where it is shown, in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the commission, that the unit is partly outside the pool or for some other reason a well otherwise located on the unit would not be likely to produce in paying quantities, or topographical conditions are such as to make the drilling at the location unduly burdensome, or other similar cause. Whenever an exception is granted, the commission shall take action as will offset any advantage which the person securing the exception may have over other owners by reason of the drilling of the well as an exception;

No drilling unit established by the commission shall be smaller than the maximum area which can be drained efficiently by one (1) vertical deep well so as to produce the reasonable maximum recoverable oil or gas in the area, unless an exception is granted in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the commission; and

An order establishing a drilling unit for a vertical deep well may be modified, altered, extended, amended, or vacated by the commission after notice and hearing as prescribed above.

Drilling units for horizontal deep wells:

For the prevention of waste and for the protection and enforcement of the correlative rights of the owners in a pool, the commission shall, after notice and hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B and with the administrative regulations of the commission, establish drilling units for horizontal deep wells. Drilling units shall be based on the information provided to or requested by the commission;

Each horizontal deep well permitted to be drilled on a drilling unit established by the commission shall be drilled in accordance with the administrative regulations promulgated by the commission and any orders of the commission; and

The establishment of any horizontal deep well unit shall be on terms that are fair, reasonable, equitable, and which are necessary or proper to protect and safeguard the respective rights and obligations of the working interest owners and the royalty owners based on the evidence before the commission.

Pooling of interests in drilling units:

When two (2) or more separately owned tracts are embraced within a drilling unit, or when there are separately owned interests in all or a part of a drilling unit, the interested persons may pool their tracts or interests for the development and operation of the drilling unit. In the absence of voluntary pooling and upon application of any operator having an interest in the drilling unit, and after the commission has given notice to all persons reasonably known to own an interest in the oil or gas in the drilling unit, and after a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, the commission shall enter an order pooling all tracts or interests in the drilling unit for the development and operation thereof and for the sharing of production therefrom. Each pooling order shall be upon terms and conditions which are just and reasonable;

All operations, including, but not limited to, the commencement, drilling, or operation of a deep well, upon any portion of a drilling unit for which a pooling order has been entered, shall be deemed for all purposes the conduct of those operations upon each separately owned tract in the drilling unit by the several owners thereof. That portion of the production allocated to a separately owned tract included in a drilling unit shall, when produced, be deemed for all purposes to have been actually produced from the tract by a deep well drilled thereon;

Any pooling order under the provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall authorize the drilling and operation of a deep well for the production of oil or gas from the pooled acreage; shall designate the operator to drill and operate the deep well; shall prescribe the time and manner in which all owners of operating interests in the pooled tracts or portions of tracts may elect to participate therein; shall provide that all reasonable costs and expenses of drilling, completing, equipping, operating, plugging, and abandoning the deep well shall be borne, and all production therefrom shared, by all owners of operating interests in proportion to the acreage in the pooled tracts owned or under lease to each owner; and shall make provision for payment of all reasonable costs thereof, including reasonable charge for supervision and for interest on past due accounts, by all those who elect to participate therein. Upon the application of any operator having an interest in the drilling unit, the person or persons selected to drill and operate the deep well shall be determined by competitive bids;

Upon request, any pooling order shall provide just and equitable alternatives whereby an owner of an operating interest who does not elect to participate in the risk and cost of the drilling of a deep well may elect to surrender his interest or a portion thereof to the participating owners on a reasonable basis and for a reasonable consideration, which, if not agreed upon, shall be determined by the commission; or to participate in the drilling of the deep well on a limited or carried basis on terms and conditions which, if not agreed upon, shall be determined by the commission to be just and reasonable;

If an operator owning an interest in a pooled drilling unit elects not to participate in the risk and cost of drilling of a deep well thereon, and another operator owning an interest therein, shall drill and operate, or pay the costs of drilling and operating a deep well as provided in the commission’s order, then the operating owner shall be entitled to the share of production from the tracts or portions thereof accruing to the interest of the nonparticipating owner, exclusive of any royalty or overriding royalty reserved in any leases, assignments thereof or agreements relating thereto, of the tracts or portions thereof, or exclusive of the prevailing royalty of the production attributable to all unleased tracts or portions thereof, until the market value of the nonparticipating owner’s share of the production, exclusive of any royalty, overriding royalty or the prevailing royalty of production, equals three (3) times the share of the costs payable by or charged to the interest of the nonparticipating owner; and

If a dispute shall arise as to the costs of drilling and operating a deep well, the commission shall determine and apportion the costs, within ninety (90) days from the date of written notification to the commission of the existence of such dispute.

This section shall not apply to wells drilled, deepened, or reopened for the injection of water, gas, or other fluids into any subsurface formation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 45, § 5; 1996, ch. 318, § 343, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 139, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 158, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 21, § 16, effective June 24, 2015.

353.652.
Unit operation of pool — Procedure.

Upon the application of any operator in a deep well pool productive of oil or gas, or both, and other minerals which may be associated and produced therewith and after notice given by the commission to all persons reasonably known to own an interest in the oil or gas in the pool, and after a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, the commission may enter a final order requiring the unit operation of a pool or of any portion or combinations thereof within a field. The unit operation shall be in connection with a program designed to avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells, or otherwise to prevent waste, or to increase the ultimate recovery of the unitized minerals by additional recovery methods. The final order shall provide for the unitization of separately-owned tracts and interests within the pool or pools, but only after finding that:

The order is reasonably necessary for the prevention of waste;

The proposed plan of unitized operation will increase the ultimate recovery of oil or gas, or both, from the pool and will be economically feasible;

The production of oil or gas, or both, from the unitized pool can be allocated in a manner to insure the recovery by all owners of their just and equitable share of the production; and

A contract incorporating the unitization agreement has been signed or in writing ratified or approved by the owners of at least seventy-five percent (75%) in interest in the pool as costs are shared under the terms of the order and by seventy-five percent (75%) in interest in the pool as production is to be allocated of the royalty in the unit area, and a contract incorporating the required arrangements for operations has been signed or in writing ratified or approved by the owners of at least seventy-five percent (75%) in interest in the pool as costs are shared, and the commission has made a finding to that effect either in the final order or a supplemental order.

The final order requiring the unit operation shall designate one (1) operator as unit operator and shall also make provision for the proportionate allocation to all operators of the costs and expenses of the unit operation, including a reasonable charge for supervision, which allocation shall be in the proportion that the separately-owned tracts share in the production from the unit. In the absence of an agreement entered into by the operators and filed with the commission providing for sharing the costs of capital investments in wells and physical equipment, and intangible drilling costs, the commission shall provide by order for the sharing of the costs in the same proportion as the costs and expenses of the unit operation, but any operator who has not consented to the unitization shall not be required to contribute to the costs or expenses of the unit operation, or to the cost of capital investment in wells and physical equipment, and intangible drilling costs, except out of the proceeds from the sale of the production accruing to the interest of the operator exclusive of any royalty or overriding royalty interest.

The commission, after notice and hearing as provided above may from time to time by entry of a new or amending final order enlarge the unit area by approving agreements adding to the area a pool or any portion or combinations thereof not previously included. Any new or amended final order shall not become effective unless and until:

All of the terms and provisions of the unitization agreement relating to the extension or enlargement of the unit area or to the addition of pools or portions or combinations thereof to unit operations have been fulfilled and satisfied and evidence thereof has been submitted to the commission; and

The extension or addition effected by the order has been agreed to in writing by the owners of at least seventy-five percent (75%) in interest in the pool as costs are shared in the pool or pools or portions or combinations thereof to be added to unit operations by the order and by seventy-five percent (75%) in interest in the pool as production is to be allocated of the royalty owners in the pool, pools, portions, or combinations and evidence thereof has been submitted to the commission.

Any agreement, in providing for allocation of production from the unit area, shall first allocate to each pool or added portion a portion of the total production of oil and gas, or both, from all pools affected within the area, as enlarged, the allocation to be in proportion to the contribution which added pool or portions or extensions thereof are expected to make, during the remaining course of unit operations, to the total production of oil or gas, or both, of the unit as enlarged. The remaining portion of unit production shall be allocated among the separately-owned tracts within the previously established unit area in the same proportions as those specified prior to the enlargement.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 45, § 6; 1990, ch. 11, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 318, § 344, effective July 15, 1996; 2015 ch. 21, § 17, effective June 24, 2015.

353.653.
Share of production from drilling unit or unitized pool.

Each operator shall have the right to take in kind its share of any oil or gas produced from any drilling unit or pool unitized under KRS

353.510

,

353.520

,

353.565

,

353.610

,

353.651

to

353.654

,

353.700

, or

353.991

. The operator shall pay the expenses occasioned thereby and pay or account to the unit operator for the oil or gas or the value thereof if he has not paid his share of drilling, completing and operating costs. This section applies to deep well drilling units only.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 45, § 9; 1990, ch. 11, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

353.654.
Drilling without consent of landowner prohibited.

Nothing contained in KRS

353.510

,

353.520

,

353.565

,

353.610

,

353.651

to

353.654

,

353.700

, or

353.991

shall be construed as authorizing any operator, with or without an order of the commission, to drill upon, enter upon, or use in any manner the surface of any land without the consent of the owner thereof as evidenced by an oil or gas lease or otherwise. This section applies to deep well drilling units only.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 45, § 10; 1990, ch. 11, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

The original House Bill 64, section 10 (Acts 1974, ch. 45, § 10) was amended by deletion of the words “as evidenced by an oil or gas lease or otherwise” from the end of the section; however, in the engrossed bill as signed by the Governor, the words were not stricken.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A hearing under this section would be required to protect the rights of all parties where the oil and gas division of the Department of Mines and Minerals is seeking to regulate the spacing of oil and gas wells under the provisions of KRS

353.560

.

OAG 72-382

.

353.655.
Use of shackle rods or related cables prohibited.

No operator shall utilize shackle rods or related cables for the production of oil or gas.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 244, § 1, effective January 1, 1985; 2019 ch. 21, § 7, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 50, § 6, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/27/2019). This statute was amended by 2019 Ky. Acts chs. 21 and 50, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

353.656.
Display of danger signs on oil storage facilities.

The well operator shall cause signs printed with the word “DANGER” and other information which may be required by the department to be prominently displayed near or on all facilities used for storage of oil whether the facilities are in active production or have been abandoned.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 127, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

353.660.
Report required after termination of operations — Contents — Confidentiality of information.

Any person to whom a permit is issued pursuant to KRS

353.500

to

353.720

shall file, within ninety (90) days after termination of operations conducted under the permit, with the department for transmittal to the Kentucky Geological Survey on forms to be furnished by the department the following information relating to the well:

A copy of the driller’s log certified to be true and accurate;

The depth and thickness of all water zones encountered and logged;

The depth of all showings of oil or gas;

The depth and thickness of all coal seams encountered; and

A true copy of all electrical surveys and similar logs and surveys taken. If the person to whom the permit is issued obtains a copy of the electrical survey or similar log or survey in electronic form, the operator shall submit the electrical survey or similar log in electronic form if requested by the department.

Upon request by the department, any person to whom a permit is issued shall save for the Kentucky Geological Survey samples of all cuttings from the well drilled or deepened pursuant to the permit for a period of ninety (90) days after completion thereof.

Upon request by any person furnishing information under this section, the information shall be kept confidential, for a period of one (1) year after the information is furnished by such person.

Upon request by any person applying for a permit for a stratigraphic test well, the division shall grant a three (3) year period of confidentiality for all drilling records required by this section from the date of completion of drilling the well.

Well records, surveys, and logs conducted on stratigraphic wells which are subsequently granted an oil or gas production permit shall comply with the confidentiality requirements in subsection (3) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 18; 1966, ch. 147, § 4; 2003, ch. 150, § 15, effective June 24, 2003; 2016 ch. 40, § 4, effective July 15, 2016.

353.6601.
Advance notice to surface owner located within 1,000 feet of high-volume horizontal fracturing treatment of a horizontal well.

An operator employing a high-volume horizontal fracturing treatment shall provide notice required under subsection (3) of this section to each surface property owner within one thousand (1,000) feet of the surface location of the proposed well, at least twenty (20) days prior to commencement of a high-volume horizontal fracturing treatment of a horizontal well. For purposes of this subsection, a surface property owner is the person who is assessed for the purpose of taxes imposed according to the records of the property valuation administrator of the county where the property is located.

The operator shall, for the purpose of giving notice, secure from the property valuation administrator’s office the names of persons entitled to notice under this section. Notice to the persons indicated as surface property owners in the office of the property valuation administrator shall be conclusive evidence that the operator has met the requirements of this section.

The notice to surface property owners shall include:

The name and address of the operator;

The surface location of the proposed well; and

The name and location of the cabinet office where the permit and related documents are available for public inspection and, if the documents are available electronically, the Web site where the permit and related documents may be inspected.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 21, § 5, effective June 24, 2015.

353.6602.
Baseline water quality testing required prior to commencement of a high-volume horizontal fracturing treatment on a deep horizontal well.

At least twenty (20) days prior to the commencement of a high-volume horizontal fracturing treatment on a deep horizontal well, an operator shall conduct a baseline water quality test of each down-gradient surface water impoundment or water supply from a groundwater source that is used for domestic, agriculture, industrial, or other legitimate use located within one thousand (1,000) feet of the surface location of the proposed deep horizontal well. Between three (3) and six (6) months following the completion of the deep horizontal well, a subsequent water quality test shall be conducted of the water supply where a baseline sample was collected.

The water quality tests shall be conducted by a laboratory certified by the cabinet for drinking water quality sampling, and the test analysis shall be submitted to the Division of Oil and Gas and to the water supply owner within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the analysis. Each set of samples collected under this section shall include analysis for:

pH;

Total dissolved solids, dissolved methane, dissolved propane, dissolved ethane, alkalinity, and specific conductance;

Chloride, sulfate, arsenic, barium, calcium, chromium, iron, magnesium, selenium, cadmium, lead, manganese, mercury, and silver;

Surfactants;

Benzene, toluene, ethyl benzene, and xylene; and

Gross alpha and beta particles to determine the presence of any naturally occurring radioactive materials.

The Division of Oil and Gas shall develop a form for an operator to document a water supply owner’s permission to collect a water sample. An operator is exempt from the requirements of this section if a water supply owner refuses to grant access despite an operator’s good faith efforts to obtain consent to acquire the necessary water quality samples. An operator shall document the good faith efforts used to seek consent from the water supply owner who refused access to conduct the water quality sampling. The operator shall submit the documented good faith efforts to the Division of Oil and Gas.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 21, § 6, effective June 24, 2015.

353.6603.
Completion of chemical disclosure registry form.

A vendor or service provider performing any part of a high-volume horizontal fracturing treatment shall furnish the operator with the information required by subsection (2) of this section, as applicable, and with any information as needed for the operators to comply with this section. The information shall be provided as soon as possible and in no case later than forty-five (45) days after the completion of a high-volume horizontal fracturing treatment.

Within ninety (90) days of concluding a high-volume horizontal fracturing treatment, the operator of the horizontal well shall complete the chemical disclosure registry form and post the form on the chemical disclosure registry. The following information shall be required to be furnished:

Operator’s name;

The date of the high-volume horizontal fracturing treatment;

The county in which the well is located;

The API number for the well;

The well name and number;

The longitude and latitude of the wellhead;

The true vertical depth of the well;

The total water volume used;

Each chemical additive used in the fracturing treatment, including the chemical abstract service number added, if applicable;

The maximum concentration, in percent by mass, of each chemical intentionally added to the base fluid, if applicable; and

The total amount of proppant used, if applicable.

A vendor, service provider, or operator shall not be required to:

Disclose any trade secrets under subsection (2)(j) of this section to the chemical disclosure registry;

Disclose chemicals that are not disclosed to it by a third-party manufacturer of the chemicals; or

Disclose chemicals that:

Occur incidentally or are otherwise unintentionally present in trace amounts;

May be the incidental result of a chemical reaction or chemical process; or

May be constituents of naturally occurring materials that become part of a high-volume horizontal fracturing treatment, where the chemicals are unknown to the vendor, service provider, or operator.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 21, § 7, effective June 24, 2015.

353.6604.
Confidentiality of trade secrets — When disclosure is required.

If the vendor, service provider, or operator of a high-volume horizontal fracturing treatment claims that the volume of a chemical or relative concentration of chemical is a trade secret, the operator of the horizontal well shall indicate that claim on the chemical disclosure registry form and, as applicable, the vendor, service provider, or operator shall submit a request to the director to designate the information as a trade secret.

At the time of claiming entitlement to trade secret protection, the vendor, service provider, or operator shall file with the director the following information on a form prescribed by the division. The form shall include:

The claimant’s name, authorized representative, mailing address, and phone number;

The specific information claimed to be entitled to trade secret protection;

Whether there has been a previous determination by a court or by a governmental agency that the information is or is not entitled to confidential treatment; and

The measures taken by the vendor, service provider, or operator to protect the confidentiality of the information.

Any information claimed to be a trade secret shall be disclosed by the director only:

In accordance with this section and KRS

353.6605

and

353.6606

; or

If ordered by a court to do so.

Vendors, service providers, and operators shall identify the volume and relative concentration of any chemicals used in the high-volume horizontal fracturing treatment that are claimed to be a trade secret to the cabinet. The cabinet shall release that information to any health professional who request the information if:

The request is in writing;

The health professional provides a written statement of the need for the information; and

The health professional executes a confidentiality agreement.

The health professional’s written statement of need under subsection (4)(b) of this section shall be a statement that the health professional has a reasonable basis to believe that:

The information is needed for purposes of diagnosis or treatment of an individual; and

The individual being diagnosed or treated may have been exposed to the chemical concerned.

The confidentiality agreement shall state:

The health professional shall not use the information for purposes other than the health needs asserted in the written statement of need; and

The health professional shall otherwise maintain the information as confidential.

Where a health professional determines that a medical emergency exists, and the amount or mixture of any chemicals claimed to be a trade secret are necessary for emergency treatment, the director shall:

Immediately direct the vendor, service provider, or operator, as applicable, to disclose the information to the health professional upon verbal acknowledgement by the health professional that:

The information shall not be used for purposes other than the health needs asserted; and

The health professional shall otherwise maintain the information as confidential; and

Request a written statement of need and a confidentially agreement from all health professionals to whom the information regarding the concentration or mixture of any chemicals claimed to be a trade secret was disclosed, as soon as circumstances permit.

Information disclosed to a health professional under this section shall not be construed as publicly available by virtue of the disclosure of the information to a health care professional. Release of the information under this section shall not be construed as a waiver of a trade secret claim by the party who has asserted that claim.

The division shall develop a form for the vendor, service provider, or operator to claim trade secret status under subsections (1) and (2) of this section and a standard confidentiality agreement for medical professionals under subsections (5), (6), and (7) of this section.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 21, § 8, effective June 24, 2015.

353.6605.
Disclosure of trade secret information to assist in responding to emergency spill or discharge.

The director shall direct a vendor, service provider, or operator, as applicable, to immediately disclose information regarding the concentration or mixture of a chemical claimed to be a trade secret to the extent that the disclosure is necessary to assist in responding to an emergency spill or discharge, except that the individuals receiving the information shall not disseminate the information further. In addition, the director upon request may disclose the specific information concerning the volume of a chemical or relative concentration of chemicals, or both, which are claimed to be a trade secret for the purpose of responding to an emergency spill or discharge if request is made by letter or electronic mail from:

The Kentucky Department for Environmental Protection;

The Kentucky Department for Natural Resources;

The Kentucky Department for Public Health; or

A local public health department.

Any information disclosed under this section shall not be construed as publicly available by virtue of the disclosure to any entity listed in this section, and release of the information under this section shall not be construed as a waiver of a trade secret claim by the party who has asserted that claim.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 21, § 9, effective June 24, 2015.

353.6606.
Treatment of trade secret information in response to open records request.

The director shall notify the vendor, service provider, or operator, as applicable, within ten (10) days of receipt of a request pursuant to the Kentucky Open Records Act for disclosure of information for which trade secret status has been asserted. The director may request additional information from the vendor, service provider, or operator, as applicable, to determine whether to grant or reject the request for disclosure.

If the cabinet determines that the information is entitled to confidential treatment and that determination is challenged pursuant to the provisions of the Kentucky Open Records Act, the director may call upon the owner or operators to assist in the defense of that determination.

If the cabinet makes a determination that the information is not entitled to confidential treatment, notwithstanding KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, the director shall:

Notify the vendor, service provider, or operator, as applicable, who asserted the trade secret status; and

Delay release of the information for a period of ten (10) working days after mailing the notice.

Judicial review of any determination under this section shall be undertaken in accordance with the Kentucky Open Records Act, and administrative review of the determination to release or to withhold information shall not be required.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 21, § 10, effective June 24, 2015.

353.670.
Promulgation of regulations — Hearing — Written record of hearing.

All rules, regulations and amendments promulgated under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

shall be promulgated by the department after notice and a hearing. At all hearings held to consider any rules, regulations or amendments thereto, any interested person shall be entitled to be heard.

All hearings held under this section shall be held at such time and place as is specified by the department, and according to rules and regulations promulgated under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

. A written record of each hearing shall be kept, unless the keeping of a record shall be waived by all parties who participate therein. All interested persons shall be entitled to be heard at all hearings conducted under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

.

The director of the Division of Oil and Gas, or his representatives, shall attend all hearings under this section conducted by the department.

All rules, regulations and orders promulgated or issued under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

shall be in writing, shall be entered in full and indexed in books to be kept by the department for that purpose, shall be public records open for inspection at all times during office hours, and shall be filed in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A. A copy of any rule, regulation, or order, certified by the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources or the director of the Division of Oil and Gas, shall be received in evidence in all courts of this Commonwealth without any further authentication thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 19; 1986, ch. 331, § 48, effective July 15, 1986; 2010, ch. 24, § 1911, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Administrative regulations, KRS Ch. 13A.

353.680.
Notice — Method of giving — Proof of service. [Repealed.]

353.690.
Production of evidence — Failure to comply.

The department shall have the power to summon witnesses, to administer oaths, and to require the production of pertinent records, books, and documents for examination at any hearing or investigation conducted under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

.

Upon failure or refusal on the part of any person to comply with a subpoena issued under this section, or upon the refusal of a witness to testify as to any matter regarding which he may be interrogated and which is pertinent to the hearing or investigation, any court of record in the Commonwealth upon the application of the commissioner shall have the power to punish for contempt as in the case of disobedience to a like subpoena issued by the court, or for refusal to testify.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 21; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 285, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Production of evidence by subpoena, KRS

421.110

to

421.150

.

Rules of Evidence for Kentucky courts, KRE, Rule 101 et seq.